Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 63
COMMUNITY COLLEGE OF AURORA

23-63-101 to 23-63-105. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article repealed, p. 771, § 31, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1983 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 1985. For the text of this article prior to 1985, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.